Utah statutes.
17B-1-120.   Exactions -- Exaction for water interest -- Requirement to offer to original owner property acquired by exaction.

(1)  A local district may impose an exaction on a service received by an applicant, including, subject to Subsection (2), an exaction for a water interest if:

(a)  the local district establishes that a legitimate local district interest makes the exaction essential; and

(b)  the exaction is roughly proportionate, both in nature and extent, to the impact of the proposed service on the local district.

(2) (a) (i)  A local district shall base an exaction for a water interest on the culinary water authority's established calculations of projected water interest requirements.

(ii)  If requested by a service applicant, the culinary authority shall provide the basis for the culinary water authority's calculations described in Subsection (2)(a)(i).

(b)  A local district may not impose an exaction for a water interest if the culinary water authority's existing available water interests exceed the water interests needed to meet the reasonable future water requirement of the public, as determined in accordance with Section 73-1-4.

(3) (a)  If a local district plans to dispose of surplus real property that was acquired under this section and has been owned by the local district for less than 15 years, the local district shall offer to reconvey the surplus real property, without receiving additional consideration, first to a person who granted the real property to the local district.

(b)  The person described in Subsection (3)(a) shall, within 90 days after the day on which a local district makes an offer under Subsection (3)(a), accept or reject the offer.

(c)  If a person rejects an offer under Subsection (3)(b), the local district may sell the real property.

